Utah statutes.
53A-15-1210.   Administration of statewide assessments to students enrolled in online courses.

(1)  A student enrolled in an online course that is a course for which a statewide assessment is administered under Chapter 1, Part 6, Achievement Tests, shall take the statewide assessment.

(2) (a)  The State Board of Education shall make rules providing for the administration of a statewide assessment to a student enrolled in an online course.

(b)  Rules made under Subsection (2)(a) shall:

(i)  provide for the administration of a statewide assessment upon a student completing an online course; and

(ii)  require an online course provider to proctor the statewide assessment.

